Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Assistance to the Blind

§ 43-3-51.
Statewide system of aid.

For the purpose of providing for blind persons in need, a statewide system of aid to the needy blind is hereby established and shall be in effect in all political subdivisions of this state to operate with due regard to the varying conditions and costs of living, to be financed by state appropriations therefor, and to be administered by the State Department of Public Welfare.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7248; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-53.
Definitions.

When used herein, the term “State Department” means the State Department of Public Welfare.

“County department” means the county board of public welfare and the county welfare agent of each of the several counties in this state.

“Applicant” means a person who has applied for assistance under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91.

“Recipient” means a person who has received assistance under the terms of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91.

“Ophthalmologist” means a physician licensed to practice medicine in this state and who is actively engaged in the treatment of diseases of the human eye.

“Assistance” means money payments, including vendor payments, made to or in behalf of needy blind persons hereunder.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7249; Laws, 1938, ch. 181; Laws, 1962, ch. 563, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1962).

§ 43-3-55.
Eligibility for assistance to the needy blind.

Assistance shall be granted under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 to any person who:

Has no vision or whose vision, with correcting glasses is so defective as to prevent the performance of ordinary activities for which eyesight is essential;

Has not sufficient income or other resources to provide a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health;

Is not an inmate of any public institution at the time of receiving assistance except as a patient in a public medical institution, or is not a patient in any institution for tuberculosis or mental diseases, or is not a patient in any medical institution as a result of having been diagnosed as having tuberculosis or psychosis. In the event the federal Social Security Act, or other appropriate federal statutes are so amended as to permit funds appropriated by Congress to be used for assistance to blind persons who are inmates of public institutions, then being an inmate of any such institution shall not disqualify any such person for assistance. An inmate of such an institution may, however, make application for such assistance but the assistance, if granted, shall not begin until after he ceases to be an inmate;

Is not receiving old age assistance;

Has not made an assignment or transfer of property for the purpose of rendering himself eligible for assistance under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 at any time within two (2) years immediately prior to the filing of application for assistance pursuant to the provisions of said sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7250; Laws, 1938, ch. 181; Laws, 1960, ch. 439, § 2.

§ 43-3-57.
Amount of assistance.

The amount of assistance which any needy blind person shall receive shall be determined by the county department with due regard to the resources and necessary expenditures of the individual and the conditions existing in each case and in accordance with the rules and regulations made by the state department, and shall be only sufficient, when added to all other income and support of the recipient, to provide such persons with a reasonable subsistence compatible with decency and health. In making such determination the state department shall disregard the earned income specified by the federal Social Security Act, as amended, and may disregard any other income of the recipient as specified in the federal Social Security Act, as amended.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7251; Laws, 1938, ch. 181; Laws, 1952, ch. 386; Laws, 1962, ch. 563, § 2; Laws, 1968, ch. 562, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved July 30, 1968).

§ 43-3-59.
Duties of State Department of Public Welfare.

The state department shall:

Supervise the administration of assistance to the needy blind under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 by the county departments;

Make such rules and regulations and take such action as may be necessary or desirable for carrying out the provisions of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91. All rules and regulations made by the state department shall be binding on the counties and shall be complied with by the respective county departments;

Designate the procedure to be followed in securing a competent medical examination for the purpose of determining blindness in the individual applicant for assistance;

Establish minimum standards for personnel employed by the state and county departments in the administration of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 and make necessary rules and regulations to maintain such standards;

Prescribe the form of and print and supply to the county departments such forms as it may deem necessary and advisable;

Cooperate with the federal government in matters of mutual concern pertaining to assistance to the needy blind, including the adoption of such methods of administration as are found by the federal government to be necessary for the efficient operation of the plan for such assistance;

Make such reports, in such form and containing such information, as the federal government may from time to time require and comply with such provisions as the federal government may from time to time find necessary to assure the correctness and verification of such reports;

Publish an annual report and such interim reports as may be necessary;

Promulgate rules and regulations stating, in terms of ophthalmic measurements, the amount of visual acuity which an applicant may have and still be eligible for assistance under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7252; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-61.
Duties of county departments.

The county departments shall:

Administer the provisions of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 in the respective counties subject to the rules and regulations prescribed by the state department pursuant to the provisions of said sections;

Report to the state department at such times and in such manner and form as the state department may from time to time direct.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7253; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-63.
Application for assistance.

Application for assistance under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 shall be made to the county department of the county in which the applicant resides. The application shall be in writing or reduced to writing in the manner and upon the form prescribed by the state department. Such application shall contain a statement of the amount of property, both personal and real, in which the applicant has an interest and of all income which he may have at the time of the filing of the application, and such other information as may be required by the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7254; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-65.
Investigation of applications.

Whenever a county department receives an application for assistance under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91, an investigation and record shall promptly be made of the circumstances of the applicant in order to ascertain the facts supporting the application and in order to obtain such other information as may be required by the rules of the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7255; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-67.
Examination by ophthalmologist or optometrist.

No application shall be approved until the applicant has been examined by an ophthalmologist or by a licensed optometrist designated or approved by the state department to make such examinations, and said applicant shall be permitted to choose whether the examination will be made by an ophthalmologist or by an optometrist. The examining ophthalmologist or optometrist shall certify in writing upon forms provided by the state department the findings of the examination.

This section shall apply to all state, county, or municipal agencies handling or administering public or private funds or private agencies handling public funds in connection with any of their visual care programs for children or adults. Sections 73-51-1 through 73-51-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall apply in actions to correct any violation of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7256; Laws, 1938, ch. 181; Laws, 1952, ch. 385; Laws, 1966, ch. 608, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved February 25, 1966).

§ 43-3-69.
Granting of assistance.

Upon the completion of such investigation the county department shall decide whether the applicant is eligible for assistance under the provisions of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91, and determine in accordance with the rules and regulations of the state department the amount of such assistance and the date on which such assistance shall begin. The county department shall notify the applicant of its decision. Such assistance shall be paid monthly to the applicant upon the order of the county department from funds allocated to the county department for this purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7257; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-71.
Assistance not assignable.

Assistance granted under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 shall not be transferable or assignable, at law or in equity, and none of the money paid or payable under said sections shall be subject to execution, levy, attachment, garnishment or other legal process, or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7258; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-73.
Appeal to the State Department of Public Welfare.

If an application is not acted upon by the county department within a reasonable time after the filing of the application, or is denied in whole or in part, or if any award of assistance is modified or canceled under any provision of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91, the applicant or recipient may appeal to the state department in the manner and form prescribed by the state department. The state department shall, upon receipt of such appeal, give the applicant or recipient reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing.

The state department may also, upon its own motion, review any decision of a county department, and may consider any application upon which a decision has not been made by the county department within a reasonable time. The state department may make such additional investigation as it may deem necessary, and shall make such decision as to the granting of assistance and the amount of assistance to be granted the applicant as in its opinion is justified and in conformity with the provisions of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91. Applicants or recipients affected by such decisions of the state department shall, upon request, be given reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing by the state department.

All decisions of the state department shall be final and shall be binding upon the county involved and shall be complied with by the county department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7259; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-75.
Periodic reconsideration and changes in amount of assistance.

All assistance grants made under Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 shall be reconsidered by the county department as frequently as may be required by the rules of the state department. After such further investigation as the county department may deem necessary or the state department may require, the amount of assistance may be changed or assistance may be entirely withdrawn if the state or county departments find that the recipient’s circumstances have altered sufficiently to warrant such action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7260; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-77.
Reexamination as to eyesight.

A recipient shall submit to a reexamination as to his eyesight when required to do so by the county or the state department. He shall also furnish any information required by the county department or by the state department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7261; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-79.
Recovery from a recipient.

If at any time during the continuance of assistance the recipient thereof becomes possessed of any property or income in excess of the amount stated in the application provided for in Section 43-3-63, it shall be the duty of the recipient immediately to notify the county department of the receipt or possession of such property or income and the county department may, after investigation, either cancel the assistance or alter the amount thereof in accordance with the circumstances. Any assistance paid after the recipient has come into possession of such property or income and in excess of his need shall be recoverable by the county as a debt due to the state and the federal government in proportion to the amount of the assistance paid by each respectively.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7262; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-81.
Fraudulent acts.

Whoever knowingly obtains, or attempts to obtain, or aids, or abets any person to obtain by means of a wilfully false statement or representation or by impersonation, or other fraudulent device, assistance to which he is not entitled, or assistance greater than that to which he is justly entitled, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or be imprisoned for not more than four (4) months, or be both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the court. In assessing the penalty, the court shall take into consideration, among other factors, the amount of money fraudulently received.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7263; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-83.
Receipt and disposition of federal and other funds and manner of disbursing same.

Federal and other funds shall be received, disposed of, and disbursed in the same manner as is provided for the handling of funds for the needy aged in Sections 43-9-33 through 43-9-37. Any funds paid to any applicant under the provisions of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 shall be paid from the funds appropriated to the state department of public welfare, and the amount paid to each applicant coming under the provisions of Sections 43-3-51 through 43-3-91 shall be on the same basis as the amount paid to other applicants similarly situated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7264; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§§ 43-3-85 and 43-3-87.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1983, ch. 422, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1983.

§43-3-85. [Codes, 1942, § 7265; Laws, 1938, ch. 181]

§43-3-87. [Codes, 1942, § 7266; Laws, 1938, ch. 181]

§ 43-3-89.
Detailed report to the Legislature.

The State Board of Public Welfare shall make a detailed report to the Legislature each year in which it convenes, showing all appropriations and donations received and how same have been expended, and covering its activities and accomplishments and making recommendations therein for the further improvement of the conditions of the blind in the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7267; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-91.
Donations may be received and expended.

The State Board of Public Welfare is hereby authorized and empowered to receive donations from any and all sources and expend same for the purpose herein outlined.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7268; Laws, 1938, ch. 181.

§ 43-3-93.
Operation by blind persons of vending stands in public buildings.

For the purpose of providing legally blind persons with remunerative employment, enlarging the economic opportunities of the blind, and stimulating the blind to greater efforts in striving to make themselves self-supporting, blind persons licensed under the provisions of this section, may operate vending facilities, snack bars or similar facilities in cooperation with the federal government in the furtherance of the provisions of the Vending Stand Act, of Congress known as the Randolph-Sheppard Vending Stand Act, dated June 20, 1936, as amended.

Definitions as used in this section:

“Blind person” shall mean any individual with insufficient vision to perform tasks for which sight is essential.

“State agency” shall mean any department, commission, agency or instrumentality of the state.

“State property or state building” means building and land controlled, leased or owned by the state, exclusive of a building and land controlled, leased or owned in whole or in part by schools, the Mississippi State Fair, or any of the colleges or universities.

“Vending facility” includes a snack bar, concession stand, cafeteria, vending stand, vending machines or other facility at which food, drinks, novelties, newspapers, periodicals, confections, souvenirs, tobacco products, or other related items are regularly sold.

“Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind” shall mean the rehabilitation agency for the blind created and empowered under Sections 37-33-53 et seq.

The Director of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind shall, with the approval of the Board of Trustees of the Mississippi School for the Blind and the Mississippi School for the Deaf, make regulations in conformity with the Randolph-Sheppard Vending Stand Act, as amended, and do all things necessary and proper to carry out the provisions of this section, including surveying opportunities for the operation of vending facilities by blind persons and collection of such set-aside funds, with such collections being placed in a special deposit fund to be used only for the following purposes authorized under the Randolph-Sheppard Vending Stand Act, as amended: (a) the maintenance and replacement of equipment; (b) management services; and (c) the purchase of new equipment.

The person, board or legislative body having the care, custody and control of any state, county or municipal building are hereby authorized and empowered to permit the establishment and operation of vending facilities by blind persons duly licensed by Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind in any state, county or municipal building under their respective jurisdictions.

In order to promote the employment and the self-sufficiency of blind persons in Mississippi, state agencies shall, upon the request of the Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind, give preference to blind persons in the operation of vending facilities on state property.

On state property, where Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind determines that a vending facility should not be established or should not continue to operate due to insufficient revenues, Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind shall have the first opportunity to secure, by negotiation of a contract with one or more licensed commercial vendors, coin or currency operated vending machines for such state property location. Profits secured by Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind from such machines shall be used only for the support of vending facilities operated by Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind.

If Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind determines that a location is suitable for the operation of a vending facility by a blind person, the state agency with authority over the location may provide proper space, plumbing, lighting and electrical outlets for the vending facility in the original planning and construction or in alteration or renovation of the present location. The state agency shall provide necessary utilities, janitorial services and garbage disposal for the operation of the vending facility. Space for the vending facility shall be provided without charge. It shall also be the duty of the state agencies to inform Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind in writing of existing or prospective vending facilities and coin or currency operated vending machines located on property under the control of the state agency.

Where, on July 1, 1985, vending facilities are operated on state property by those other than blind persons, the contract or agreement for the provision of such vending facilities shall not be renewed or extended unless the Director of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind is notified thereof, and he determines within thirty (30) days of the date of such notification that the vending facilities are not, or cannot become, suitable for operation by the blind. However, if the Director of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind fails to provide for the operation of the vending facilities by the blind within thirty (30) days of such notification, the existing contract may be renewed or extended.

This section is not intended to apply to food services provided by hospitals or residential institutions as a direct service to patients, inmates, trainees or institutionalized persons.

This section shall not prohibit the continued use of coin-operated vending machines currently the property of Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind.

Any blind vendor operating such vending facility is subject to the provisions of any ordinance of the county or city in which the vending facility is located requiring a license or permit for the conduct of each business, but such license or permit may be issued free of charge to a blind vendor licensed by Vocational Rehabilitation for the Blind pursuant to federal and state laws.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7269.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 568, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 361, eff from and after July 1, 1985.